Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-8806
Navigator; individual with existing
health insurance coverage; information.

On contact with an individual who acknowledges
having existing health insurance coverage obtained through a licensed insurance
producer, a navigator shall make a reasonable effort to inform the individual
that he or she may, but is not required to, seek further assistance from that
producer or another licensed producer for information, assistance, and any
other services and that tax credits may not be available to offset the premium
cost of plans that are marketed outside of the exchange.

Laws 2013, LB568, § 6.